Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act (REPLICA)

§ 33-36-201.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act” or “REPLICA.”

History.

2017 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective
date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 38, §
3, makes
the act effective July 1, 2017.